backend/sq_AL_cleaned.aff
SFX O7 Y 4
SFX O7 0 re [ëit] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O7 0 resh [ëit] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O7 0 ret [ëit] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O7 0 reve [ëit] po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX O8 Y 4
SFX O8 0 -e . po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O8 0 -esh . po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O8 0 -et . po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O8 0 -eve . po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX O9 Y 4
SFX O9 0 -ë . po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O9 0 -ësh . po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O9 0 -ët . po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX O9 0 -ëve . po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX P1 Y 3
SFX P1 0 -i . po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX P1 0 -in . po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX P1 0 -it . po:noun is:sg is:mas

SFX P2 Y 2
SFX P2 0 -n . po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX P2 0 -t . po:noun is:sg is:mas

SFX P3 Y 3
SFX P3 0 -u . po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX P3 0 -un . po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX P3 0 -ut . po:noun is:sg is:mas
